North Dakota, session 69, HB1577.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 23.1-07 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Wastewater infrastructure grant program.
1. The department shall award wastewater infrastructure grants to eligible entities identified in
subsection 2 to upgrade, replace, or construct infrastructure for a wastewater collection
system, wastewater disposal system, or wastewater treatment plant.
2. Cities, counties, townships, water resource districts, recreation service districts, and water
districts operating wastewater systems in the state may receive a grant under this section for
an eligible project, subject to the availability of funds.
3. In awarding wastewater infrastructure grants to eligible entities, the department shall prioritize
eligible entities that:
a. Have experienced a reduction in previously approved federal funds or federal assistance
related to wastewater infrastructure projects; and
b. Are prepared to begin the wastewater infrastructure project upon receipt of the grants.
4. An eligible wastewater system must be in compliance with current wastewater regulations
unless the project will return the system to compliance. Eligible projects may not include
operations and maintenance costs.
5. The department may not award a grant in excess of sixty percent of the total cost of a project
and shall ensure no community receives a grant for more than one project per biennium.
SECTION 2. A new subsection to section 23.1-07-06 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Administer the wastewater infrastructure grant program.
SECTION 3. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - WASTEWATER PROJECT FUND. During
the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall study the feasibility and desirability of
establishing a wastewater project fund to provide grants for upgrading, constructing, or replacing
wastewater infrastructure. The study must include input from cities, counties, townships, and water
resource districts. The legislative management shall report its findings and recommendations, together
with any legislation required to implement the recommendations, to the seventieth legislative assembly.

H. B. NO. 1577 - PAGE 2
SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY -
WASTEWATER INFRASTRUCTURE GRANTS - BANK OF NORTH DAKOTA LINE OF CREDIT -
ONE-TIME FUNDING.
1. The department of environmental quality may borrow up to $9,700,000 through a line of credit
from the Bank of North Dakota, which is appropriated to the department of environmental
quality for the purpose of providing wastewater infrastructure grants during the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The interest rate associated with the line of
credit may not exceed the prevailing interest rate charged to North Dakota governmental
entities. The department of environmental quality shall request a deficiency appropriation from
the seventieth legislative assembly to repay the line of credit.
2. Of the total appropriated in this section, the department of environmental quality shall provide
grants of $7,800,000 and $1,900,000 to entities with eligible wastewater infrastructure projects
under section 1 of this Act. If an entity awarded funding under this section receives federal
funding for the same wastewater infrastructure project, the entity shall remit the federal
funding to the department of environmental quality for the repayment of the line of credit.
3. The appropriation in this section is considered a one-time funding item.
SECTION 5. EMERGENCY. This Act is declared to be an emergency measure.

H. B. NO. 1577 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1577 and that
two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 74 Nays 16 Absent 4
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 42 Nays 4 Absent 1
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State